Florida, session 2026, HB53.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
67
68 Section 1. Section 351.41, Florida Statutes, is created to
69 read:
70 351.41 Rapid Rail Transit Compact.—The Governor, on behalf
71 of this state, is hereby authorized to execute a compact, in
72 substantially the following form, with the States of Alabama,
73 Louisiana, and Mississippi, and the Legislature hereby signifies
74 in advance its approval and ratification of such compact:
75
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb53-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 53 2026
76 RAPID RAIL TRANSIT COMPACT
77 ARTICLE I
78 The purpose of this compact is to study the feasibility of
79 rapid rail transit service between the states of Alabama,
80 Florida, Louisiana, and Mississippi and to establish a joint
81 interstate commission to assist in this effort.
82
83 ARTICLE II
84 This compact shall become effective immediately as to the
85 states ratifying it whenever the States of Alabama, Florida,
86 Louisiana, and Mississippi have ratified it and Congress has
87 given consent thereto. Any state not mentioned in this article
88 which is contiguous with any member state may become a party to
89 this compact, subject to approval by the legislature of each of
90 the member states.
91
92 ARTICLE III
93 The states which are parties to this compact, hereinafter
94 referred to as party states, do hereby establish and create a
95 joint agency which shall be known as the Southern Rail
96 Commission, hereinafter referred to as the commission, or any
97 successor name adopted by all members of the commission. The
98 membership of such commission shall consist of the governor of
99 each party state, one representative each from the Mississippi
100 Energy and Transportation Board, or its successor, the Office of
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb53-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 53 2026
101 Aviation and Public Transportation of the Louisiana Department
102 of Transportation and Development, or its successor, the Alabama
103 Department of Energy, or its successor, and the Florida
104 Department of Transportation, or its successor, and five other
105 citizens of each party state, to be appointed by the governor
106 thereof. The appointed members of the commission shall serve for
107 terms of 4 years each. Vacancies on the commission shall be
108 filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion
109 of the term. The members of the commission shall not be
110 compensated for service on the commission, but each of the
111 appointed members shall be entitled to actual and reasonable
112 expenses incurred in attending meetings, or incurred otherwise
113 in the performance of his or her duties as a member of the
114 commission. The members of the commission shall hold regular
115 quarterly meetings and such special meetings as its business may
116 require. They shall choose annually a chairman and vice chairman
117 from among their members, and the chairmanship shall rotate each
118 year among the party states in order of their acceptance of this
119 compact. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations for
120 the transaction of its business and a record shall be kept of
121 all its business. It shall be the duty of the commission to
122 study the feasibility of providing interstate rapid rail transit
123 service between the party states. Toward this end, the
124 commission shall have power to hold hearings; to conduct studies
125 and surveys of all problems, benefits, and other matters
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb53-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 53 2026
126 associated with such service, and to make reports thereon; to
127 acquire, by gift, grant, or otherwise, from local, state,
128 federal, or private sources, such money or property as may be
129 provided for the proper performance of its functions, and to
130 hold and dispose of same; to cooperate with other public or
131 private groups, whether local, state, regional, or national,
132 having an interest in such service; to formulate and execute
133 plans and policies for emphasizing the purpose of this compact
134 before the Congress of the United States and other appropriate
135 officers and agencies of the United States; and to exercise such
136 other powers as may be appropriate to enable it to accomplish
137 its functions and duties and to carry out the purposes of this
138 compact.
139
140 ARTICLE IV
141 Each party state agrees that its legislature may, in its
142 discretion, from time to time make available and pay over to the
143 commission funds for the establishment and operation of the
144 commission. The contribution of each party state shall be in
145 equal amounts, if possible, but nothing in this article shall be
146 construed as binding the legislature of any state to make an
147 appropriation of a set amount of funds at any particular time.
148
149 ARTICLE V
150 Nothing in this compact shall be construed so as to
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb53-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 53 2026
151 conflict with any existing statute, or to limit the powers of
152 any party state, or to repeal or prevent legislation, or to
153 affect any existing or future cooperative arrangement or
154 relationship between any federal agency and a party state.
155
156 ARTICLE VI
157 (1) This compact shall continue in force and remain
158 binding upon each party state until the legislature or governor
159 of each or any state takes action to withdraw therefrom.
160 However, any such withdrawal does not become effective until 6
161 months after the date of the action taken by the legislature or
162 governor. Notice of such action shall be given to the other
163 party state or states by the secretary of state of the party
164 state which takes such action.
165 (2) There is hereby granted to the Governor, to the
166 members of the commission for Alabama, Florida, Louisiana, and
167 Mississippi, and to the compact administrator all the powers
168 provided for in the compact and in this section. All officers of
169 this state are hereby authorized and directed to do all things
170 falling within their respective jurisdictions which are
171 necessary or incidental to carrying out the purpose of the
172 compact.
173 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb53-00